District of Columbia statutes.
2-554

Documents to be filed in the District of Columbia Office of Documents.

Any document required or authorized to be published in the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations or the District of Columbia Register shall be filed with the District of Columbia Office of Documents. If a document has been published pursuant to subchapter I of this chapter and forwarded to the Office of the Secretariat prior to March 6, 1979, such document need not be filed with the District of Columbia Office of Documents, unless the Administrator otherwise notifies the person responsible for filing the document.

History

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title III, § 304
as added Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-153, § 4, 25 DCR 6960

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-556.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1534.
1973 Ed., § 1-1534.